Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that as the duties and responsibilities of the office of lieutenant governor have continued to incrementally increase, they have been distributed among various noncorresponding chapters in statute. The legislature further finds that by consolidating the duties and responsibilities of the office of lieutenant governor under one chapter, it keeps our statutes consistent among the different statewide elected offices and greater facilitates the understanding of the role of the office of lieutenant governor and its many statutorily defined duties and responsibilities.

[ 2006 c 317 s 1.]